North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 4. Naval Militia.

§ 127A-67.
Organization and equipment.

The organization of the naval militia shall be units of convenient size, in each of which the number and rank of officers and the distribution of the total enlisted strength among the several ratings of petty officers and other enlisted personnel shall be such as are prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy, who may also prescribe the number of officers and the number of petty officers and other enlisted personnel required for the organization of the units into larger bodies for administrative and other purposes, and the arms and equipment of the naval militia shall be those which are now or may hereafter be prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 66; C.S., s. 6836; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “organization of the units” for “organization of such units.”

§ 127A-68.
Officers appointed to naval militia.

Officers of the United States Navy and Marine Corps may, with the approval of the Secretary of the Navy, be appointed by the Governor and commissioned as officers of the naval militia.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 67; C.S., s. 6837; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “Navy and Marine Corps” for “navy and marine corps.”

§ 127A-69.
Officers assigned to duty.

Line officers of the naval militia may be for line duties only, for engineering duties only, or for aeronautic duties only.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 68; C.S., s. 6838; 1975, c. 604, s. 2.

§ 127A-70.
Discipline in naval militia.

The naval militia shall be subject to the system of discipline prescribed for the United States Navy and Marine Corps, and the commanding officer of a naval militia unit or a naval militia officer in command of naval militia forces on shore or on any vessel of the United States Navy loaned to the State, or on any vessel on which such forces are training, whether within or without the State, or wherever, either within or without the State, naval militia forces of the State shall be assembled pursuant to orders, shall have power without trial by courts-martial to impose upon members of the naval militia the punishments which the commanding officer of a vessel of the United States Navy is authorized by law to impose.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 69; C.S., s. 6839; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “Navy and Marine Corps” for “navy and marine corps” and “naval militia unit” for “naval militia battalion or brigade,” and twice substituted “United States Navy” for “navy.”

§ 127A-71.
Disbursing and accounting officer.

The Governor shall appoint a disbursing officer, approved by and of a rank prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy, to perform the duties the Secretary of the Navy may prescribe. The Governor shall also appoint the disbursing officer, or another officer of the appropriate finance office of the naval militia that the Governor may elect, as accounting officer for each unit thereof, or at the Governor’s option for each larger unit or combination of units, who shall be responsible for the proper accounting for all public property issued to and for the use of the unit or larger unit or combination of units.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 70; C.S., s. 6840; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the last sentence, substituted “another officer” for “such other officer” and “appropriate finance office” for “pay corps,” and twice substituted “unit” for “battalion,” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-72.
Rendition of accounts.

Accounting officers shall render accounts as prescribed by the Governor or by the Secretary of the Navy, and shall be required to give good and sufficient bond to the State and to the United States, in the sums that the Governor or the Secretary of the Navy directs, and conditioned upon the faithful accounting for all public property and for the safekeeping of the part thereof in the personal custody of the officer. Accounting officers may issue any or all such property to other officers or enlisted personnel of the naval militia under applicable rules and regulations.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 71; C.S., s. 6841; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “under applicable rules and regulations” for “under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-73.
Disbandment of naval militia.

No part of the naval militia which is entitled to compensation under the provisions of an act of Congress approved August 29, 1916, shall be disbanded without the consent of the President.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 86; C.S., s. 6842; 1975, c. 604, s. 2.

§ 127A-74.
Courts-martial for naval militia.

Courts-martial for the naval militia, not in the service of the United States, shall be organized, have the same powers, functions and authorities, and follow the same procedures as courts-martial for the North Carolina National Guard as set forth in

G.S. 127A-47

through 127A-62.

History.

1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina” and substituted “G.S. 127A-47 through 127A-62” for “G.S. 127A-47 through 127A-61.”

§§ 127A-75 through 127A-79.

Reserved for future codification purposes.